Utah statutes.
71-11-3.   Establishment and construction -- Compliance with federal requirements.

(1)  The department shall administer veterans' nursing homes established by the Legislature.

(2)  Each home shall:

(a)  have at least an 80-bed capacity;

(b)  be designed and constructed consistent with the requirements for federal funding under 38 U.S.C. Sec. 8131 et seq.; and

(c)  be operated consistent with the requirements for per diem payments from the United States Department of Veterans Affairs under 38 U.S.C. Sec. 1741 et seq.

